Hawaii statutes.
[§428-104] Supplemental principles of law.
(a) Unless displaced by particular provisions of this chapter, the principles
of law and equity supplement this chapter.

(b) If an obligation to pay interest arises
under this chapter and the rate is not specified, the rate is that specified in
section 478-2. [L 1996, c 92, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next